Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202281-5,244
Certain appropriations to Department of Labor; how treated.

Any appropriation and salary limit provided in any legislative bill enacted by the One Hundred Sixth Legislature, First Session, to Agency No. 23 — Department of Labor, in any of the following program classifications, shall be null and void, and any such amounts are hereby appropriated to Agency No. 21, State Fire Marshal: Program No. 230 — Safety Inspection Program; Program No. 194, Division for Protection of People and Property, Subprogram 009 — Conveyance; and Program No. 194, Division for Protection of People and Property, Subprogram 010 — Boiler Inspection. Any financial obligations of the Department of Labor that remain unpaid as of June 30, 2019, and that are subsequently certified as valid encumbrances to the accounting division of the Department of Administrative Services pursuant to sections 81-138.01 to 81-138.04, shall be paid by the State Fire Marshal, Program No. 230 — Safety Inspection Program, from the unexpended balance of appropriations existing in such program classification on June 30, 2019.

Laws 2019, LB301, § 80.